Illinois, session 104th, SB1325.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Dental Practice Act is amended by 5changing Section 6 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 25/6)  (from Ch. 111, par. 2306)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 6. Board of Dentistry; report Dentistry - report by 9majority required. There is created a Board of Dentistry, to 10be composed of 13 persons designated from time to time by the 11Secretary, as follows:12        (1) 10 members who Eleven persons, 8 of whom have been 13    dentists for a period of 5 years or more, at least one of 14    whom holds a permit to administer moderate sedation, and 15    at least one of whom holds a permit to administer deep 16    sedation and general anesthesia;17        (2) 2 members who of whom have been dental hygienists 18    for a period of 5 years or more; , and19        (3) one public member. 20    None of the members shall be an officer, dean, assistant 21dean, or associate dean of a dental college or dental 22department of an institute of learning, nor shall any member 23be the program director of any dental hygiene program. A board   SB1325 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03526 AAS 13549 b1member who holds a faculty position in a dental school or 2dental hygiene program shall not participate in the 3examination of applicants for licenses from that school or 4program. The dental hygienists shall not participate in the 5examination of applicants for licenses to practice dentistry. 6The public member shall not participate in the examination of 7applicants for licenses to practice dentistry or dental 8hygiene. The board shall annually elect a chairman and 9vice-chairman who shall be dentists.10    Terms for all members shall be for 4 years. Partial terms 11over 2 years in length shall be considered as full terms. A 12member may be reappointed for a successive term, but no member 13shall serve more than 2 full terms in his or her lifetime.14    The membership of the Board shall include only residents 15from various geographic areas of this State and shall include 16at least some graduates from various institutions of dental 17education in this State.18    In making appointments to the Board the Secretary shall 19give due consideration to recommendations by organizations of 20the dental profession in Illinois, including the Illinois 21State Dental Society and Illinois Dental Hygienists 22Association, and shall promptly give due notice to such 23organizations of any vacancy in the membership of the Board. 24The Secretary may terminate the appointment of any member for 25cause which in the opinion of the Secretary reasonably 26justifies such termination.  SB1325 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 03526 AAS 13549 b1    A vacancy in the membership of the Board shall not impair 2the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform 3all the duties of the Board. Any action to be taken by the 4Board under this Act may be authorized by resolution at any 5regular or special meeting, and each such resolution shall 6take effect immediately. The Board shall meet at least 7quarterly. 8    The members of the Board shall each receive as 9compensation a reasonable sum as determined by the Secretary 10for each day actually engaged in the duties of the office, and 11all legitimate and necessary expense incurred in attending the 12meetings of the Board.13    Members of the Board shall be immune from suit in any 14action based upon any disciplinary proceedings or other 15activities performed in good faith as members of the Board.16(Source: P.A. 99-492, eff. 12-31-15.)